Utah statutes.
78B-6-610.   Disobedience of writ -- Punishment.
When a peremptory writ of mandate or writ of prohibition has been issued and
directed to an inferior tribunal, corporation, board, or person, and the court
determines that any member of the tribunal, corporation, board, or person upon
whom the writ was personally served has, without just excuse, refused or
neglected to obey the writ, the court may, upon motion, impose a fine not
exceeding $500. In cases of persistence in a refusal of obedience, the court
may order the party to be imprisoned until the writ is obeyed, and may make
any orders necessary and proper for enforcement of the writ.
